Rhode Island, session 2025, SB712.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46-15 of the General Laws entitled "Water Resources Management"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-15-24 New Shoreham water district obligations.
The commissioners of the New Shoreham Water district, governed by its board of water
commissioners, may specifically limit its public water system's obligation to supply water only to
those applicants who reside within its designated and described service area as opposed to the entire
land area of the municipality.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002323/SUB A
========